src/fst/morphology/affixes/numerals.lexc
LEXICON NIELJI-
      +Sg+Com:jn  K ;
 +Sg+Com+Attr:jn  K ;

      +Pl+Gen:j   K ;
      +Pl+Acc:jt  K ;
      +Pl+Ill:jda K ;
      +Pl+Ine:jn  K ;
      +Pl+Ela:js  K ;
      +Pl+Com:j   K ;


LEXICON VIHTTA
              :htta%> VIHTTA-IE  ;
              :dá%>   VIHTTA-OBL ; !weak grade cases
 +Der5+Der/akti+Adv:htti%> K          ;

LEXICON VIHTTA-IE
 +Sg+Ill:j K ;
    +Ess:n K ;
 +Sg+Nom:  K ; !

LEXICON VIHTTA-OBL
        +Sg+Gen:      K-VOW               ;
     +Cmp/SgGen:      NUMERALCOMPOUNDS    ;
        +Sg+Acc:v     K-CONS              ;
        +Sg+Ine:n     K-CONS              ;
        +Sg+Ela:s     K-CONS              ;
        +Sg+Com:jn    K-CONS              ;
        +Sg+Par:t     K-CONS              ;

   +Sg+Ill+Attr:      K-VOW               ;
   +Sg+Ine+Attr:n     K-CONS              ;
   +Sg+Ela+Attr:t     K-CONS              ;
   +Sg+Com+Attr:jn    K-CONS              ;

        +Pl+Nom:      K-VOW               ;
        +Pl+Gen:j     K-CONS              ;
        +Pl+Acc:jt    K-CONS              ;
        +Pl+Ill:jda   K-VOW               ;
        +Pl+Ine:jn    K-CONS              ;
        +Pl+Ela:js    K-CONS              ;
        +Pl+Com:j     K-CONS              ;


!LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GÅLMMÅ
!              :å%>   ẈG-LÅK-GÅLMMÅ-NAIE ;
!              :å%>Q1 ẈG-LÅK-GÅLMMÅ-OBL  ;
! +Der5+Der/akti+Adv:i%>   K                   ;
!
!LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GÅLMMÅ-NAIE
!       +Sg+Ill:j     K                   ;
! !           +Ess:n K                ;
!   +Sg+Acc+Use/NG:  K                ;
!
!LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GÅLMMÅ-OBL
!          +Sg+Acc:v K                ;
!          +Sg+Gen:  K                ;
!       +Cmp/SgGen:  NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
!          +Sg+Ine:n K                ;
!          +Sg+Ela:s K                ;
! !        +Sg+Com:jn K ;
!          +Sg+Par:t  K ;
!
!     +Sg+Ill+Attr:   K ;
!     +Sg+Ine+Attr:n  K ;
!     +Sg+Ela+Attr:t  K ;
!     +Sg+Com+Attr:jn K ;

LEXICON GIETJAV
              :ja%>   GIETJAV-IE  ;
              :ja%>Q1 GIETJAV-OBL ; !weak grade cases
 +Der5+Der/akti+Adv:tji%>  K           ;

LEXICON GIETJAV-IE
        +Sg+Ill:j K ;
           +Ess:n K ;
 +Sg+Nom+Use/NG:  K ; !giehtja

LEXICON GIETJAV-OBL
        +Sg+Nom:v      K                   ; !in Spiik, OK and AK giehtja nom
        +Sg+Gen:       K                   ;
     +Cmp/SgGen:       NUMERALCOMPOUNDS    ;
        +Sg+Acc:v      K                   ;
        +Sg+Ine:n      K                   ;
        +Sg+Ela:s      K                   ;
        +Sg+Com:jn     K                   ;
        +Sg+Par:t      K                   ;

   +Sg+Ill+Attr:       K                   ;
   +Sg+Ine+Attr:n      K                   ;
   +Sg+Ela+Attr:t      K                   ;
   +Sg+Com+Attr:jn     K                   ;

        +Pl+Nom:       K                   ;
        +Pl+Gen:j      K                   ;
        +Pl+Acc:jt     K                   ;
        +Pl+Ill:jda    K                   ;
        +Pl+Ine:jn     K                   ;
        +Pl+Ela:js     K                   ;
        +Pl+Com:j      K                   ;


!LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GIETJAV
!              :ja%>   ẈG-LÅK-GIETJAV-IE  ;
!              :ja%>Q1 ẈG-LÅK-GIETJAV-OBL ;
! +Der5+Der/akti+Adv:tji%>  K                   ;
!
!LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GIETJAV-IE
!       +Sg+Ill:j      K                   ;
! ! +Ess:n K ;
!
!LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GIETJAV-OBL
! ! +Sg+Nom+Use/NG:v K                ;
!          +Sg+Gen:  K                ;
!       +Cmp/SgGen:  NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
!          +Sg+Acc:v K                ;
!          +Sg+Ine:n K                ;
!          +Sg+Ela:s K                ;
! !        +Sg+Com:jn K ;
!          +Sg+Par:t  K ;
!
!     +Sg+Ill+Attr:   K ;
!     +Sg+Ine+Attr:n  K ;
!     +Sg+Ela+Attr:t  K ;
! !   +Sg+Com+Attr:jn K ;

LEXICON GÁKTSA
                     GÁKTSA- ; !gáktsa
              :e%>Q1 GÁVTSE- ; !gávtse
              :i%>Q1 GÁVTSI- ; !gávtsi
 +Der5+Der/akti+Adv:i%>   K       ;

LEXICON GÁKTSA-
                 +Sg+Nom:%>a  K ;
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:%>e  K ; ! not sure about the e-ending, dont think its standardized
       +v2+Sg+Acc+Use/NG:%>a  K ;
                 +Sg+Ill:á%>j K ;
                    +Ess:a%>n K ;
             +Ess+Use/NG:e%>n K ; ! not sure about the e-ending, dont think its standardized

LEXICON GÁVTSE-
      +Sg+Acc:v K                ; !in OK, but standardized?
      +Sg+Gen:  K                ;
   +Cmp/SgGen:  NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
      +Sg+Ine:n K                ;
      +Sg+Ela:s K                ;
      +Sg+Par:t K                ;

 +Sg+Ill+Attr:  K                ;
 +Sg+Ine+Attr:n K                ;
 +Sg+Ela+Attr:t K                ;

      +Pl+Nom:  K                ;

LEXICON GÁVTSI-
        +Sg+Com:jn    K               ;
   +Sg+Com+Attr:jn    K               ;

        +Pl+Gen:j     K               ;
        +Pl+Acc:jt    K               ;
        +Pl+Ill:jda   K               ;
        +Pl+Ine:jn    K               ;
        +Pl+Ela:js    K               ;
        +Pl+Com:j     K               ;

!LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GÁKTSA
!                     ẈG-LÅK-GÁKTSA-  ;
!              :e%>Q1 ẈG-LÅK-GÁVTSE- ;
! +Der5+Der/akti+Adv:i%>   K               ;
!             !:i%>Q1 ẈG-LÅK-GÁVTSI- ;
!
!LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GÁKTSA-
! !        +Sg+Nom:%>a K ;
! ! +Sg+Nom+Use/NG:%>e  K ;
!   +Sg+Acc+Use/NG:%>a  K ;
!          +Sg+Ill:á%>j K ;
! !           +Ess:a%>n K ;
! !    +Ess+Use/NG:e%>n K                ;
!
!LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GÁVTSE-
!          +Sg+Acc:v    K                ;
!          +Sg+Gen:     K                ;
!       +Cmp/SgGen:     NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
!          +Sg+Ine:n    K                ;
!          +Sg+Ela:s    K                ;
!          +Sg+Par:t    K                ;
!
!     +Sg+Ill+Attr:     K                ;
!     +Sg+Ine+Attr:n    K                ;
!     +Sg+Ela+Attr:t    K                ;

!LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GÁVTSI-
!          +Sg+Com:jn   K                ;
!     +Sg+Com+Attr:jn   K                ;

LEXICON AKTSE
                     AKTS-  ;
              :e%>Q1 AVTSE- ;
              :i%>Q1 AVTSI- ;
 +Der5+Der/akti+Adv:i%>   K      ;

LEXICON AKTS-
           +Sg+Nom:e%>  K ;
 +v2+Sg+Acc+Use/NG:e%>  K ;
           +Sg+Ill:á%>j K ;
              +Ess:e%>n K ;

LEXICON AVTSE-
      +Sg+Acc:v K                ; !in OK, but standardized?
      +Sg+Gen:  K                ;
   +Cmp/SgGen:  NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
      +Sg+Ine:n K                ;
      +Sg+Ela:s K                ;
      +Sg+Par:t K                ;

 +Sg+Ill+Attr:  K                ;
 +Sg+Ine+Attr:n K                ;
 +Sg+Ela+Attr:t K                ;

      +Pl+Nom:  K                ;

LEXICON AVTSI-
        +Sg+Com:jn    K             ;
   +Sg+Com+Attr:jn    K             ;

        +Pl+Gen:j     K             ;
        +Pl+Acc:jt    K             ;
        +Pl+Ill:jda   K             ;
        +Pl+Ine:jn    K             ;
        +Pl+Ela:js    K             ;
        +Pl+Com:j     K             ;

!LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-AKTSE
!                     ẈG-LÅK-AKTS-  ;
!              :e%>Q1 ẈG-LÅK-AVTSE- ;
!              :i%>Q1 ẈG-LÅK-AVTSI- ;
! +Der5+Der/akti+Adv:i%>   K             ;
!
!LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-AKTS-
! !        +Sg+Nom:e%>  K ;
!   +Sg+Acc+Use/NG:e%>  K ;
!          +Sg+Ill:á%>j K ;
! !           +Ess:e%>n K                ;
!
!LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-AVTSE-
!          +Sg+Acc:v    K                ;
!          +Sg+Gen:     K                ;
!       +Cmp/SgGen:     NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
!          +Sg+Ine:n    K                ;
!          +Sg+Ela:s    K                ;
!          +Sg+Par:t    K                ;
!
!     +Sg+Ill+Attr:     K                ;
!     +Sg+Ine+Attr:n    K                ;
!     +Sg+Ela+Attr:t    K                ;
!
! !        +Pl+Nom: K ;
!
!LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-AVTSI-
! !      +Sg+Com:jn K ;
! ! +Sg+Com+Attr:jn  K ;
!
!        +Pl+Gen:j   K ;
!        +Pl+Acc:jt  K ;
!        +Pl+Ill:jda K ;
!        +Pl+Ine:jn  K ;
!        +Pl+Ela:js  K ;
! !      +Pl+Com:j K ;
