src/fst/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON LÅGENAN
lågenangiehtja+v1+Num+CmpN/SgG:lågenan#gieht GIETJAV ;
lågenangáktsa+v1+Num+CmpN/SgG:lågenan#gákts GÁKTSA ;
lågenanaktse+v1+Num+CmpN/SgG:lågenan#akts AKTSE ;
